Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1392
Historically significant real property; Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the base-year valuation of historically significant real property.

Laws 2005, LB 66, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 78.